Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 202542-1405
Family resource and juvenile assessment center; provide assessments and services.

(1) Each family resource and juvenile assessment center shall host multiple community providers, grassroots organizations, and embedded community navigators to assess and serve the immediate and ongoing needs of youth and families.

(2) Each center shall provide assessments and services free of charge to families and maintain active membership in the National Assessment Center Association.

(3) The purpose of the assessment shall be to (a) enable youth and families to discuss a family's unique dynamic, challenges, and goals in a safe, culturally respectful environment, (b) identify the origin of presenting issues and provide comprehensive service referrals in partnership with local organizations and businesses, and (c) engage youth and families in creating tailored action plans for long-term success.

Laws 2025, LB48, § 5.